Connecticut, session 2026, HB05254.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 4-189i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[(a) Not later than July 1, 2017, and not later than every seven years
thereafter, each committee of cognizance, in consultation with each
agency that is within the cognizance of the committee, shall establish the
date by which each such agency shall submit a review of its existing
regulations and shall notify the administrator of the regulation review
committee of each such date and any extension thereof. In establishing
such date, or any extension of the date that may be requested by the
agency, the committee of cognizance (1) shall consider the volume and
complexity of such regulations and the personnel and other resources
of the agency that would be available to undertake the review within
the agency's available appropriations, and (2) may establish a schedule
of dates for the review of various portions of such regulations upon the
agreement of the committee of cognizance and the administrative head
of the agency.
(b) Not later than the date specified by the committee of cognizance
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5254
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, each such agency shall submit
to the committee of cognizance and to the administrator of the
regulation review committee]
(a) Not later than February 1, 2027, (1) (A) the office of the Governor
shall prescribe an individual timetable for each agency of the Executive
Department that reports to the Governor, and (B) any other agency not
in the Executive Department shall prescribe an individual timetable for
such agency, to conduct a review of its existing regulations, [which]
provided any such individual timetable shall be not later than every
seven years, and (2) the office of the Governor shall notify the regulation
review committee and the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
oversight of each such individual timetable. Any such review of existing
regulations shall include, but need not be limited to: [(1)] (A) The
agency's recommendations on how it may substantially reduce the
number and length of its existing regulations; [(2)] (B) the agency's
determination of whether each of its existing regulations [(A)] (i) is
obsolete, [(B)] (ii) has not been used within the preceding seven years,
[(C)] (iii) is inconsistent with any provision of the general statutes,
federal law or any regulation adopted under the general statutes or
federal law, [(D)] (iv) has been the subject of written complaints, and
[(E)] (v) is otherwise no longer effective; and [(3)] (C) the agency's
recommendation, if any, regarding any extraordinary circumstances in
which waivers from its existing regulations may be appropriate.
(b) Not later than the specified initial submission date for the
completion of such review determined pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, and, thereafter, the reoccurring scheduled timetable prescribed
individually by the office of the Governor or the agency, as applicable,
each agency shall (1) submit a summary of the results of the review
conducted under subsection (a) of this section to the administrator of
the regulation review committee, the committee of cognizance and the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to government oversight, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, and (2) post a listing of any regulations
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5254
recommended to be repealed on its Internet web site and the
eRegulations System and shall provide a public comment period for
interested persons to present their views on the proposed repeal of such
regulations on the eRegulations System.
(c) Upon receipt of an agency's [review] summary of the results of its
review, the committee of cognizance [shall] may schedule a public
hearing, which, if applicable, shall be held not later than ninety days
following such receipt. The committee of cognizance shall make copies
of the [review] summary available to the public at least fifteen days prior
to [the] any hearing.
(d) Following the public hearing, if applicable: (1) The committee of
cognizance may request the agency to initiate the process under chapter
54 to carry out a recommendation of the agency under subsection [(b)]
(a) of this section to amend or repeal an existing regulation which, in the
determination of the committee of cognizance, does not require the
enactment of authorizing legislation, and (2) the committee of
cognizance shall consider any recommendation by the agency under
subsection [(b)] (a) of this section which, in the determination of the
committee of cognizance, would require the enactment of authorizing
legislation.
(e) If an agency fails to submit a summary of the results of the review
of its regulations to the committee of cognizance, [and] the
administrator of the regulation review committee and the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to government oversight as required by subsection (b) of this
section or if the committee of cognizance determines that the agency has
not conducted a satisfactory review of its regulations as required by
[said] subsection (a) of this section, the committee of cognizance may:
(1) Conduct a review of the existing regulations of the agency, as
described in subsection [(b)] (a) of this section, (2) request the agency to
initiate the process under chapter 54 to carry out a recommendation of
the committee of cognizance pursuant to such review to amend or
repeal an existing regulation which, in the determination of the
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5254
committee of cognizance, does not require the enactment of authorizing
legislation, and (3) introduce legislation to authorize the agency to
amend or repeal existing regulations. If the agency fails to initiate the
process to amend or repeal an existing regulation pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection, the committee of cognizance may
introduce legislation requiring the agency to initiate such process.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (3) of section 4-189h of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(3) "Existing regulation" means a regulation that was adopted by an
agency no later than one year prior to the scheduled date of review, as
provided in subsection [(b)] (a) of section 4-189i, as amended by this act;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 4-189i
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 4-189h(3)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Sec. 1(b), "eliminated" and "elimination" were changed to "repealed"
and "repeal", respectively, for consistency.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4